test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-roqvzt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - roʼvzt (rištīng): # Noun 212 'eng /est inimesed/fin' - full paradigm
     roʼvzt+N+Pl+Nom: [roʼvzt, rovzt]
     roʼvzt+N+Pl+Gen: [roʼvzt, rovzt]
     roʼvzt+N+Pl+Par: [roʼvžti, rovžti]
     roʼvzt+N+Pl+Dat: [roʼvztõn, rovztõn]
     roʼvzt+N+Pl+Ins: [roʼvztõks, rovztõks]
     roʼvzt+N+Pl+Ill: [roʼvztiž, rovztiž]
     roʼvzt+N+Pl+Ela: [roʼvztist, rovztist]
